Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Prohibited Practices and Disciplinary Proceedings.

Sec. 08.87.200.
Prohibited practices.

A certified real estate appraiser may not

act negligently or incompetently or fail without good cause to exercise reasonable diligence in developing an appraisal, preparing an appraisal report, or communicating an appraisal;

wilfully disregard or violate a provision of this chapter or of a regulation adopted by the board under this chapter;

fail to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation;

accept a fee for an appraisal assignment that is contingent upon the appraiser reporting a predetermined estimate, analysis, or opinion or upon the opinion, conclusion, or valuation reached, or upon the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment;

knowingly make a false statement, submit false information, or fail to provide complete information in response to a question in an application for certification or for renewal of a certificate; or

violate the confidential nature of government records to which the person gains access through retention as an appraiser by the government agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.87.210.
Disciplinary proceedings.

The board may exercise its disciplinary powers under AS

08.01.075

if, after hearing, the board finds a certified real estate appraiser has

violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted by the board under this chapter;

been convicted of a crime that involves moral turpitude; or

committed, while acting as a real estate appraiser, an act or omission involving dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation with the intent to benefit the appraiser or another person or to injure another person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.87.215.
Prohibited practices; real estate appraisal management companies.

A real estate appraisal management company may not, while registered in the state, retain or enter into a business relationship with an employee, contractor, or agent whose certificate to act as a real estate appraiser is denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state unless the employee, contractor, or agent has later had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser granted or reinstated by the same state.

A real estate appraisal management company or a controlling person, employee, director, officer, or agent of a real estate appraisal management company may not

seek to influence a real estate appraiser through intimidation, coercion, extortion, or bribery;

condition payment of an appraisal fee on a real estate appraiser’s opinion, conclusion, or valuation;

request that a real estate appraiser report a predetermined opinion, conclusion, or valuation;

alter, amend, or change an appraisal report submitted by a real estate appraiser without the real estate appraiser’s written consent;

require a real estate appraiser to sign an indemnification agreement for a claim that does not arise from a service performed by the real estate appraiser;

prohibit an appraiser from recording in the body of the report submitted by the appraiser to the appraisal management company the fee that the appraiser was paid by the company for the performance of the appraisal;

prohibit lawful communication between a real estate appraiser and any other person who the real estate appraiser determines possesses information relevant to the appraisal;

engage in an act or practice with intent to impair a real estate appraiser’s independence, objectivity, and impartiality;

knowingly make a false statement, submit false information, or fail to provide complete information in response to a question in an application for registration or renewal of a registration; or

violate this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 08.87.220.
Disciplinary proceedings; real estate appraisal management companies.

The board may take disciplinary action under AS

08.01.075

or suspend or revoke a registration of a real estate appraisal management company if it finds that the

company or a controlling person, employee, director, officer, or agent of a real estate appraisal management company has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted by the board under this chapter;

company or a controlling person of the company has had a certificate to act as a real estate appraiser or a registration as a real estate appraisal management company denied, cancelled, suspended, revoked, put on probation, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state;

company fails to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice under 12 U.S.C. 3339;

company performs appraisal management services in a manner that causes injury or loss to the public;

company has ceased to operate in the state as a real estate appraisal management company; or

company used fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing a registration under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 11,
ch. 67, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.